Maine, session 132, LD562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3024, 4th ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 445, §1 and affected
by §3, is further amended to read:
The Chief Medical Examiner may authorize any other expenses necessary to carry out
the Chief Medical Examiner's duties. The Chief Medical Examiner shall reimburse a
funeral establishment that transports a body to Augusta at the request of the Office of Chief
Medical Examiner at the following rates: for up to and including the first 25 miles, $120
$135; for the next 25 miles, $2 $2.20 per mile traveled while actually transporting a body;
and for miles in excess of 50, $1.75 $2 per mile traveled while actually transporting a body.
If an employee of a funeral establishment is required to wait at the Office of Chief Medical
Examiner due to processes or other official activities of the Chief Medical Examiner, the
Chief Medical Examiner shall reimburse the funeral establishment at a rate equal to the
wage rate in Title 26, section 664, subsection 1 for the period of time the employee waits.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the transportation reimbursement rate and to
establish a reimbursement rate for employees of funeral establishments requested to
transport a body for the Office of Chief Medical Examiner who are required to wait.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $12,000
Page 1 - 132LR2232(07)